Alabama, session 2026rs, HB366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Effective commencing on the next term of
office of the county revenue commissioner, the Revenue
Commissioner of Randolph County shall receive an annual salary
of seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) per year payable in
equal bi-weekly installments.
(b) The salary provided by this section shall be in
lieu of any salary or other compensation provided by law and
shall be paid from the same funding sources as the salary of
the revenue commissioner is paid on October 1, 2026.
(c) The revenue commissioner shall be eligible for any
cost-of-living increases granted to other county officers.
Section 2. Section 45-56-83, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§45-56-83
(a)(1) Pursuant to Amendment 459 to the Constitution of
Alabama of 1901, the Judge of Probate of Randolph County shall
be entitled to receive total compensation in accordance with
Section 12–13–20. The salary shall be paid in lieu of all
other fees, allowances, and percentages heretofore provided by
law, and shall be paid in equal in the same manner
installments out of the general fund of the county as county
employees are paid. Effective commencing on October 1, 2027,
Page 1

employees are paid. Effective commencing on October 1, 2027,
HB366 Enrolled
the Judge of Probate of Randolph County shall receive an
annual salary of seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) per year
payable in equal bi-weekly installments.
(2) The salary provided by this subsection shall be in
lieu of any salary or other compensation provided by law and
shall be paid from the same funding sources as the salary of
the judge of probate is paid on October 1, 2026.
(3) The judge of probate shall be eligible for any
cost-of-living increases granted to other county officers.
(b) All fees, commissions, allowances, percentages, and
other charges heretofore collected for the use of the judge of
probate, hereafter shall be collected and paid into the
general fund of the county.
(c) Upon the recommendation of the judge of probate,
the governing body of Randolph County shall provide the
probate office with office personnel, clerks, deputies, and
quarters, books, stationery, furniture, equipment, and other
conveniences and supplies as are necessary for the proper and
efficient conduct of the office. The judge of probate shall
appoint a chief clerk who shall have the same power as the
judge of probate, except the power to preside in a contested
cause. Compensation of any personnel so provided shall be
fixed by the county governing body and shall be paid in equal
installments out of the general fund of the county, as other
county employees are paid.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB366 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 10-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 19-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3